District of Columbia statutes.
9-911

Refunding bonds.

The Authority may provide by resolution for the issuance of its revenue refunding bonds for the purpose of refunding any bonds then outstanding which shall have been issued under the provisions of this chapter, including the payment of any redemption premium on the bonds and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of the bonds, and if considered advisable by the Authority, for either or both of the following additional purposes: constructing improvements, extensions or enlargement of the Authority facilities in connection with which the bonds to be refunded shall have been issued; and, paying all or any part of the cost of any additional Authority facilities. The issuance of bonds, the maturities, and other details of the issuance, the rights of the holders of the bonds, and the rights, duties and obligations of the Authority in respect to the bonds, shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter insofar as this chapter may be applicable. Revenue refunding bonds issued under this section may be sold or exchanged for outstanding bonds issued under this chapter and, if sold, the proceeds of the bonds may be applied to the purchase, redemption, or payment of outstanding bonds.

Dec. 3, 1985, D.C. Law 6-67, § 12, 32 DCR 6093
1981 Ed., § 7-1261.